Utah statutes.
58-68-503.   Penalties for unlawful and unprofessional conduct.

(1)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Section 58-68-501, or Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a) or 58-1-501(1)(c) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  The division may assess administrative penalties in accordance with Section 58-68-402, for acts of unprofessional conduct.

